Utah statutes.
17B-2a-509.   State engineer not prohibited from increasing water allotment.

Nothing in this part may be construed to prohibit the state engineer, upon petition by an irrigation district board of trustees, from increasing the maximum allotment of water for one or more tracts of land within the district if the state engineer determines that the land cannot be beneficially irrigated with the currently allotted water.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

